Utah statutes.
13-46-303.   Liability.
The state and a person with whom the department contracts under Section
13-46-301 is not liable to any person for:
(1)  the design, implementation, or operation of the database as provided in
this chapter; or
(2)  the collection and disclosure of information in the database as provided
in this chapter.
